Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health  Authority, in collaboration with the Department of
Consumer and Business Services, shall create an implementation plan for a public  health
plan to be made  available to individuals and families in the individual health insurance mar-
ket. The plan may also be made available to small employers whose  employees struggle with
health care costs.
(2) The authority and the department shall analyze:
(a) Potential federal opportunities to support a  state-supported public health plan such
as a  basic health plan or, in collaboration with the Department of Consumer and Business
Services, a waiver for state innovation,  under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care
Enrolled House Bill 2010 (HB 2010-B) Page 1
Act, options for the state to obtain federal waivers  to further increase affordability or other
opportunities.
(b) Which populations in this state are most  in need of new coverage options and how
new options could be tailored to the needs of specific population.
(c) The effect that introducing a public health plan may have on  the overall stability of
insurance markets in this state.
(d) How the American  Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (P.L. 117-2) and other federal program
changes may improve affordability and access to coverage and how these changes  inform
state policy options related to developing a new coverage option.
(e) How a state-based technology platform could  further the implementation and acces-
sibility of a public health plan.
(f) Adverse consequences of certain  design elements which the state may wish to avoid,
including not adopting a public health plan.
(g) What level of additional subsidies, such as premium assistance or cost-sharing  sub-
sidies, would help with affordability for Oregonians struggling with health care costs.
(h) Coverage strategies being developed by the Task Force on Universal Health Care.
(3) Based  on the analyses performed under subsection (2) of this section, the authority
and the department shall make recommendations on:
(a) The operating structure and governance of the public  health plan, including which
agency will administer the plan and how a delivery system will be procured.
(b) How the state can leverage existing state-backed plans or networks, such as  coordi-
nated care organizations and plans offered  by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board and the
Oregon Educators Benefit Board, to offer a more affordable option.
(c) Plan design options  to reduce out-of-pocket costs for individuals to reduce barriers
to care at the point of service.
(d) How the plan can further the state  goals of health system transformation including
but not limited to:
(A) The use of value-based payment and global budgets;
(B) Eliminating health disparities;
(C) Aligning quality and access metrics; and
(D) Meeting the state’s cost growth target.
(e) Cost containment options and opportunities for the state  to leverage state purchasing
power to ensure program affordability and ensure that per capita costs stay  within the cost
growth target.
(f) Plan and program design options aligned with the state’s  goal of eliminating health
inequities in the next 10 years.
(g) Other structural and program changes  the state could make to ensure successful
implementation of any plans developed, including how  a state-based technology platform
could further the implementation and accessibility of a public health plan option.
(h) Enrollment  infrastructure that may be needed by coordinated care organizations, if
coordinated care organizations are the recommended delivery system, to enroll members  in
a separate program.
(i) Outreach infrastructure and investments that would support  educating people in this
state, particularly communities of color and populations with above-average  uninsured rates,
about available options for subsidized coverage and newly available options under the Amer-
ican Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (P.L. 117-2),  and support increasing enrollment of eligible indi-
viduals in existing programs that provide affordable coverage.
(j) Statutory changes needed to implement the recommendations.
(4) The authority and the  department may rely upon previous studies on implementing
a basic health plan  or other public options conducted for the state by Manatt, Phelps and
Phillips, research and consultation from the Task Force on Universal Health Care and any
other relevant public option studies or reports completed within the past five years.
Enrolled House Bill 2010 (HB 2010-B) Page 2
(5) The authority and the department shall contract with outside experts, if necessary,
to get the needed analyses within the required deadlines.
(6) No later than January 1, 2022, the  authority and the department shall report to the
Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in  ORS 192.245, on the implementation plan
created under subsection (1) of  this section, including the analyses under subsection (2) of
this section and recommendations under subsection (3) of this section. The report shall also
include any future legislative changes needed to  secure federal waivers or federal funding
or any additional state authority needed to implement the public health plan.
(7) The authority may take steps  necessary to obtain federal approval, if necessary, to
implement a public health plan and to convey to the Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid
Services this Legislative Assembly’s support for a public health plan.
SECTION 2.
(1) No later than July  1, 2022, the Oregon Health Authority shall report to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the  manner pro-
vided in ORS 192.245, recommendations for a regional global budget  health care delivery
model pilot.
(2) The recommendations must:
(a) Take into account state  and private participation in the health insurance exchange
and may include employer-sponsored plans; and
(b) Be aligned with the state goals for health care transformation,  including the use of
value-based payments and the health care cost  growth target established in accordance with
ORS 442.386.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
to the Oregon  Health Authority, by section 1 (3), chapter , Oregon Laws 2021 (En-
rolled House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  central services, state
assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $650,000 for carrying out section  1 of
this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2010 (HB 2010-B) Page 3
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2010 (HB 2010-B) Page 4